Missouri, session 2026, SB1675.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 182.711, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 182.711,
to read as follows:
182.711. 1. The fiscal year for each urban public
library district shall be July first to June thirtieth,
unless otherwise set by the board of trustees, and each year
the librarian shall submit to the board of trustees a budget
for the forthcoming fiscal year. The board of trustees
shall approve the budget after making any changes therein
that it deems necessary. The budget shall be approved on or
before [June thirtieth] the last day of the fiscal year
preceding the fiscal year for which the budget was
prepared. The board of trustees on its own motion or at the
request of the librarian, from time to time, may amend or
modify the approved budget. A copy of the approved budget
shall be filed with the state auditor.
2. The treasurer of the board of trustees of an urban
public library district shall receive and be the custodian
of all money belonging to the district from whatever source
derived. All funds of the urban public library district
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1675 2
derived from local taxation to be used for normal operations
of the district shall be kept in a library operating fund.
All funds belonging to the district which are to be used for
building purposes shall be kept in a library building fund;
all funds derived from state aid or federal grants, other
than land, building and furnishing grants, shall be kept in
the library operating fund; and the board of trustees may
establish any other funds that it deems necessary. The
treasurer shall deposit all moneys belonging to the urban
public library district in the depositaries that are
selected by the board of trustees. The treasurer shall also
be the custodian of all bonds or other securities belonging
to the urban public library district.
3. Urban public library district moneys shall be
disbursed by the treasurer by appropriate instrument of
payment only upon due authorization of the board of trustees
and duly certified for payment by the president. The
certification shall specify the amount to be paid, to whom
payment is to be made and the purpose for which payment is
being made. The board of trustees by resolution may direct
that the signature of the president or treasurer be a
facsimile signature in the manner provided by sections
105.272 to 105.278.
4. No authorization or certification shall be made,
and no instrument of payment shall be issued for the payment
of any urban public library district indebtedness unless
there is sufficient money in the treasury and the proper
fund for the payment of the indebtedness and the
indebtedness is in the proper form.
5. The treasurer of the board of trustees shall submit
to the board of trustees, at each regularly scheduled
meeting thereof, an accounting reflecting receipt and

SB 1675 3
disbursement of funds belonging to the urban public library
district.
✓